Utah statutes.
63C-4a-305.   Communication with other states and governmental entities.

A commission cochair may correspond with the presiding officer of the legislative branch of another state or an entity of another state that has powers and duties that are similar to the commission to discuss and coordinate the evaluation of and response to federal law as provided in Section 63C-4a-303.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 101, 2013 General Session

